Hawaii statutes.
§431:4-309 Rights of members. (a) A
domestic mutual insurer is owned by and shall be operated in the interest of
its members.

(b) Each member is entitled to one vote in the
election of directors and on matters coming before corporate meetings of members,
subject to such reasonable minimum requirements as to duration of membership
and amount of insurance held as may be made in the insurer's bylaws. The
person named as the policyholder in any group insurance policy issued by the
insurer shall be deemed the member, and shall have but one vote regardless of
the number of individuals insured by the policy.

(c) With respect to the management, records,
and affairs of the insurer, a member shall have the same character of rights
and relationship as a stockholder has toward a domestic stock insurer. [L 1987,
c 347, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next